Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3939.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin PUBLIC EDUCATION CAMPAIGN.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of public safety must implement a statewide information campaign to educate the public about laws requiring drivers to slow down and change lanes when passing certain stopped vehicles, consistent with Minnesota Statutes, section 169.18, subdivisions 11 and 11a. new text end new text begin (b) $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for the purposes of this section. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end